Hawaii statutes.
§78-16.5 Pay of officers and employees on
active military service and other periods. (a) All officers and employees
of the State and the several counties who are appointed for at least six months
of service shall be entitled, while on active duty, inactive-duty training, or
during periods of camps of instruction or field maneuvers as members of the
national guard or reserve of the armed forces under call of the President of
the United States or the governor of the State, to receive pay as provided by
law. During the absence of the officer or employee, while in the performance
of ordered military or naval duty, including inactive-duty training, as a
member of the national guard or reserve of the armed forces, the officer or
employee shall receive the officer's or employee's salary or compensation as an
officer or employee, but only for a period not exceeding fifteen working days
in any calendar year.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), if the
officer or employee is called to active duty or otherwise required to report
for camp training or field maneuvers by official military orders a second time
within a calendar year, the officer or employee may elect to use the fifteen
working days of the succeeding calendar year to which the officer or employee
is entitled for such purposes within the current calendar year; provided that
the officer's or employee's entitlement to fifteen working days under this
section for the succeeding calendar year shall be canceled and the officer or
employee shall so agree in writing. [L 2003, c 109, pt of §5; am L 2016, c 201,
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next